Tennessee, session 114, HB0199.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-403(a)(10), is amended by
adding the following as a new subdivision:
( ) The commissioner may issue a variance within the covered area or
jurisdiction under § 68-221-410, which shall supersede any more stringent local
requirements;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-221-410(a), is amended by
adding the following new subdivision:
( ) The commissioner may require a variance granted under this section to be
filed and recorded with the county register of deeds with respect to the property subject
to the variance.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0199
000984
- 1 -